test/tools/tokenize-dog-in.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

+N
+V
+Foc
+Cmp
@PMATCH_INPUT_MARK@
@PMATCH_BACKTRACK@
+ErrSpace
%#

LEXICON Root
DOG;
cat+N+Cmp%#:cat DOG;
be+V:be SPACEDOG;
leat+V+Du3:lea UNSPACEDOG;
leat+V+Sg3:leaba ENDLEX;
bedog+V:be% dog ENDLEX;
skuvla+N:skuvla ENDLEX;
busse+N:busse ENDLEX;
busset+V:busse ENDLEX;
< {skuvla} "@PMATCH_BACKTRACK@":0 "@PMATCH_INPUT_MARK@":" " {busse} "+N":0 "+ErrSpace":0 > ENDLEX ;

LEXICON ENDLEX
#;

LEXICON DOG
dog+N:dog ENDLEX;
ba+Foc:ba ENDLEX;

LEXICON SPACEDOG
@PMATCH_INPUT_MARK@:%  DOG;

LEXICON UNSPACEDOG
@PMATCH_INPUT_MARK@:0 DOG;
